California, session 20252026, AB2413.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 82035.8 is added to the Government Code, to read:82035.8. “Large-format public advertisement” means any of the following:(a) A billboard.(b) Wrap on a bus or other public transportation vehicle.(c) Advertisements affixed to a bus stop or other public infrastructure.(d) Other public advertisements that are 24 inches by 36 inches or more in size and that are specified by regulation.SEC. 2. Section 89001 of the Government Code is amended to read:89001. (a) A newsletter or other mass mailing shall not be sent at public expense.(b) A An agency shall not publish or display a large-format public advertisement shall not be published or displayed at public expense. expense, as provided in Section 89002.1.SEC. 3. Section 89002.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:89002.1. (a) A large-format public advertisement is prohibited by Section 89001 if both the following criteria are met:(1) The large-format public advertisement includes the photograph of an elected officer affiliated with the agency that produces or purchases the large-format public advertisement, and is prepared in cooperation, consultation, coordination, or concert with the elected officer. advertisement.(2) The costs of distribution of the advertisement are paid for with public money, or the costs of design, production, and printing are paid for with public money, and the design, production, or printing is done with the intent of publishing or displaying the advertisement. money.(b) For purposes of this section, “elected officer affiliated with the agency” means an elected officer who is a member, officer, or employee of the agency, or of a subunit thereof such as a committee, or who has supervisory control over the agency or appoints one or more members of the agency.(c) If an agency prepares a large-format public advertisement in violation of subdivision (a) in cooperation, consultation, coordination, or concert with the elected officer, then the elected officer and the agency shall be jointly and severally liable for any administrative or civil penalties incurred for the violation.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.